brailleTables/sd-pk-g2.ctb
# --- سنڌي اختصار — Sindhi abbreviations  (25 entries) ---
word \x0627\x0644\x0628\x062A\x0647 1-123-2345
word \x0627\x062A\x0641\x0627\x0642 1-2345-124
word \x0627\x0645\x06AA\x0627\x0646 1-134-13
word \x0627\x0645\x06AA\x0627\x0646\x064A 1-134-13-24
word \x0628\x0631\x0627\x0628\x0631 12-12
word \x0628\x0639\x062F 12-12356
word \x0628\x0627\x0639\x062B 12-1456
word \x062C\x0645\x0644\x0648 245-134
word \x062C\x0645\x0644\x064A 245-134
word \x0687\x0627\x06A9\x064A 16-13-236
word \x0644\x062D\x0627\x0638 123-156
word \x0645\x0646\x0627\x0633\x0628 134-12
word \x0645\x0646\x0627\x0633\x0628\x062A 134-12-2345
word \x0645\x0631\x062A\x0628\x0648 134-1235-2345
word \x0645\x0631\x062A\x0628\x0627 134-1235-2345
word \x0645\x0637\x0627\x0628\x0642 134-23456
word \x0645\x0637\x0627\x0628\x0642\x062A 134-23456-2345
word \x0645\x0639\x0645\x0648\x0644\x064A 134-12356-134
word \x0645\x0639\x0645\x0648\x0644\x0627\x062A 134-12356-134-2345
word \x0645\x0639\x0646\x064A\x0670 134-12356
word \x0645\x0627\x0647\x0648\x0627\x0631 134-2456
word \x0647\x0645\x064A\x0634\x0647 125-125-125
word \x064A\x0644\x06AF\x0627\x0631 24-123
word \x064A\x0639\x0646\x064A 24-12356
word \x064A\x06AA\x062F\x0645 24-145

# --- contractions that stand for a PHRASE, not a word ---
# liblouis `word` rules cannot match across a space, so the 32 entries
# below are not in this table.  They are implemented in the reference
# translator (tools/sindhi_braille.py), which can see more than one word.
#   تيئن ته                      6-2345
#   پوءِ ته                      6-1234
#   چئبو ته                      6-14
#   ڇاڪاڻ ته                     6-16
#   فرمايو ته                    6-124
#   مطلب ته                      6-134
#   ڳالھ ٻولھ                    45-13456
#   ان طرح                       1-23456
#   ان طرف                       1-23456-124
#   ڏکڻ طرف                      34-23456-124
#   ان کان پوءِ                  1-13-236-1234
#   ان کان سواءِ                 1-13-236-234
#   ان کان علاوه                 1-13-236-12356
#   کان علاوه                    13-236-12356
#   اوڀر طرف                     1-23-23456-124
#   اولهه طرف                    1-2456-23456-124
#   اتر قطب                      1-12345
#   ڏکڻ قطب                      34-12345
#   پنهنجو پاڻ                   1234-1234
#   پنهنجي طرف                   1234-23456
#   جهڙي طرح                     245-23456
#   جفط ( جنهن طرف               245-23456
#   جنهن قدر                     245-12345
#   خواه مخواه                   1346-1346
#   ڏينهون ڏينهن                 34-125-34
#   ڪنهن طرف                     13-23456-124
#   ڪيتري قدر                    13-12345
#   هڪ دفعي                      125-145
#   هڪ ڀيري                      125-23
#   هيڏانهن هوڏانهن              125-34-125-125
#   هن طرف                       125-23456
#   هڪ ٻئي                       125-13-26

# --- ڳانڊڙا — groups written in the middle or at the end of a word ---
# Book pages 15 (dots 5-6) and 17 (dots 4-6).  Both tables are printed almost
# entirely BLANK: only three rows on each page carry an entry.  These six are
# everything the book gives.  `midendword` is the exact match for the heading
# «لفظن جا وچان ۽ پويان ڳانڊڙا» — medial and final groups.
midendword \x064A\x0627\x0628 56-12   # dots 5-6 + ب
midendword \x064A\x0646\x062F 56-145   # dots 5-6 + د
midendword \x0627\x0631\x0627 56-1235   # dots 5-6 + ر
midendword \x0648\x0627\x0628 46-12   # dots 4-6 + ب
midendword \x0628\x0627\x062F 46-145   # dots 4-6 + د
midendword \x0648\x06AA\x0631 46-1235   # dots 4-6 + ر
